Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.558

Waiver of tuition and fees for state employees and educational employees—Report.

(1) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community and technical colleges may waive all or a portion of the tuition and services and activities fees for state employees as defined under subsection (2) of this section, teachers and other certificated instructional staff under subsection (3) of this section, and K-12 classified staff under subsection (4) of this section. The enrollment of these persons is pursuant to the following conditions:

(a) Such persons shall register for and be enrolled in courses on a space available basis and no new course sections shall be created as a result of the registration;

(b) Enrollment information on persons registered pursuant to this section shall be maintained separately from other enrollment information and shall not be included in official enrollment reports, nor shall such persons be considered in any enrollment statistics that would affect budgetary determinations; and

(c) Persons registering on a space available basis shall be charged a registration fee of not less than five dollars.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "state employees" means persons employed half-time or more in one or more of the following employee classifications:

(a) Permanent employees in classified service under chapter 41.06 RCW;

(b) Permanent employees governed by chapter 41.56 RCW pursuant to the exercise of the option under *RCW 41.56.201;

(c) Permanent classified employees and exempt paraprofessional employees of technical colleges; and

(d) Faculty, counselors, librarians, and exempt professional and administrative employees at institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

(3) The waivers available to state employees under this section shall also be available to teachers and other certificated instructional staff employed at public common and vocational schools.

(4) The waivers available under this section shall also be available to classified staff employed at public common schools, as defined in RCW 28A.150.020, when used for coursework relevant to the work assignment or coursework that is part of a teacher preparation program.

(5) In awarding waivers, an institution of higher education may award waivers to eligible persons employed by the institution before considering waivers for eligible persons who are not employed by the institution.

(6) If an institution of higher education exercises the authority granted under this section, it shall include all eligible state employees in the pool of persons eligible to participate in the program.

(7) In establishing eligibility to receive waivers, institutions of higher education may not discriminate between full-time employees and employees who are employed half-time or more.

(8) Each institution of higher education that awards waivers under this section must report annually to the student achievement council with the number, type, and value of waivers awarded under this section in the prior academic year, and must compare this information with other tuition and fee waivers awarded by the institution.

[ 2019 c 295 s 230; 2016 c 233 s 18; 2015 c 55 s 221; 2007 c 461 s 1; 2005 c 249 s 4; 2003 c 160 s 2; 1997 c 211 s 1; 1996 c 305 s 3; 1992 c 231 s 20; 1990 c 88 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 41.56.201 was repealed by 2002 c 354 s 403, effective July 1, 2005.

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28A.310.235.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28B.10.033.

Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28B.102.030.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.415.265.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.180.120.

Finding—Intent—2003 c 160: "The legislature finds that military and naval veterans who have served their country in wars on foreign soil have risked their own lives to defend both the lives of all Americans and the freedom that define[s] and distinguish[es] our nation. It is the intent of the legislature to honor veterans of the Korean conflict for the public service they have provided to their country." [ 2003 c 160 s 1.]

Effective date—1996 c 305 s 3: "Section 3 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [March 30, 1996]." [ 1996 c 305 s 4.]

Severability—1996 c 305: See note following RCW 28B.85.020.

Effective date—1992 c 231: See note following RCW 28B.10.016.